Mississippi, session 2026, HB4148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Randall Lee McCulloch of Winston County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Burglary-General in Montgomery County, on October 16, 1989, for which he was sentenced to serve five (5) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was released to parole on December 5, 1990 and discharged on October 30, 1992. For three counts of Embezzlement, he was sentenced to four (4) years on counts 1 and 3 to run concurrently and three (3) years for count 2. He was released to Earned Release Supervision on July 8, 2002, and discharged on April 20, 2003.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.